NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.aff
SFX 3 Y 40
SFX 3   st   šu    [^ie]st
SFX 3   t    0     [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   š     [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   šam   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   šat   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   šot   [^ie]st
SFX 3   t    iet   [^ie]st
SFX 3   st   šu    [^m]est
SFX 3   t    0     [^m]est
SFX 3   st   š     [^m]est
SFX 3   st   šam   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   šat   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   šot   [^m]est
SFX 3   t    iet   [^m]est
SFX 3   st   tu    [m]est
SFX 3   st   t     [m]est
SFX 3   st   tam   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tat   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tot   [m]est
SFX 3   st   tiet  [m]est
SFX 3   st   tu   [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   t    [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tam  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tat  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tot  [^r]ist
SFX 3   st   tiet [^r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ītu   [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   īti   [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   īt    [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ītam  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ītat  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ītot  [r]ist
SFX 3  ist   ītiet [r]ist
SFX 3  ikt   īku    [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   īc     [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   īk     [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   īkam   [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   īkat   [i]kt
SFX 3  t     šot    [i]kt
SFX 3  ikt   īciet  [i]kt

SFX 7 Y 132
SFX 7  t   stu   [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   sti   [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   st    [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stam  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stat  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stot  [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  t   stiet [^szgkpe]t
SFX 7  0   u    [z]t
SFX 7  0   i    [z]t
SFX 7  0   am   [z]t
SFX 7  0   at   [z]t
SFX 7  0   ot   [z]t
SFX 7  0   iet  [z]t
SFX 7  0   u    [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   i    [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   am   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   at   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   ot   [^ir]st
SFX 7  0   iet  [^ir]st
SFX 7  irst ērtu   irst
SFX 7  irst ērt    irst
SFX 7  irst ērtam  irst
SFX 7  irst ērtat  irst
SFX 7  irst ērtot  irst
SFX 7  irst ērtiet irst
SFX 7  0   u    [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   i    [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   am   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   at   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   ot   [^z]ist
SFX 7  0   iet  [^z]ist
SFX 7  st  estu    [z]ist
SFX 7  st  esti    [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estam   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estat   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estot   [z]ist
SFX 7  st  estiet  [z]ist
SFX 7  gt  egu    igt
SFX 7  gt  edz    igt
SFX 7  gt  eg     igt
SFX 7  gt  egam   igt
SFX 7  gt  egat   igt
SFX 7  gt  edziet igt
SFX 7  gt  egot   igt
SFX 7  agt ogu     agt
SFX 7  agt odz     agt
SFX 7  agt og      agt
SFX 7  agt ogam    agt
SFX 7  agt ogat    agt
SFX 7  agt odziet  agt
SFX 7  agt ogot    agt
SFX 7  t   stu   [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   sti   [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   st    [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stam  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stat  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stot  [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  t   stiet [^aiulr]kt
SFX 7  akt  oku   akt
SFX 7  akt  oc    akt
SFX 7  akt  ok    akt
SFX 7  akt  okam  akt
SFX 7  akt  okat  akt
SFX 7  akt  ociet akt
SFX 7  akt  okot  akt
SFX 7  kt  eku      ikt
SFX 7  kt  ec       ikt
SFX 7  kt  ek       ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekam     ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekat     ikt
SFX 7  kt  eciet    ikt
SFX 7  kt  ekot     ikt
SFX 7  ukt  ūku    ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūc     ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūk     ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūkam   ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūkat   ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūciet  ukt
SFX 7  ukt  ūkot   ukt
SFX 7  ilkt  elku   [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elc    [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elk    [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkam  [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkat  [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elciet [i]lkt
SFX 7  ilkt  elkot  [i]lkt
SFX 7  t   stu     [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   sti     [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   st      [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stam    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stat    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stot    [a]lkt
SFX 7  t   stiet   [a]lkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērku    irkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērk     irkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērkam   irkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērkat   irkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērciet  irkt
SFX 7  irkt  ērkot   irkt
SFX 7  t   stu   [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   sti   [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   st    [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stam  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stat  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stot  [^air]pt
SFX 7  t   stiet [^air]pt
SFX 7  ipt  īpu    ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īpi    ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īp     ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īpam   ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īpat   ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īpiet  ipt
SFX 7  ipt  īpot   ipt
SFX 7  apt  opu    apt
SFX 7  apt  opi    apt
SFX 7  apt  op     apt
SFX 7  apt  opam   apt
SFX 7  apt  opat   apt
SFX 7  apt  opiet  apt
SFX 7  apt  opot   apt
SFX 7  irpt  ērpu   irpt
SFX 7  irpt  ērp    irpt
SFX 7  irpt  ērpam  irpt
SFX 7  irpt  ērpat  irpt
SFX 7  irpt  ērpiet irpt
SFX 7  irpt  ērpot  irpt
SFX 7  t  nu   et
SFX 7  t  n    et
SFX 7  t  nam  et
SFX 7  t  nat  et
SFX 7  t  niet et
SFX 7  t  not  et

SFX H Y 6
SFX H   t   ju    [āēīoū]t
SFX H   t   0     [āēīoū]t
SFX H   t   jam   [āēīoū]t
SFX H   t   jat   [āēīoū]t
SFX H   t   jiet  [āēīoū]t
SFX H   t   jot   [āēīoū]t


SFX G Y 5
SFX G   t   jas     [āēīoū]t
SFX G   t   jamies  [āēīoū]t
SFX G   t   jaties  [āēīoū]t
SFX G   t   jieties [āēīoū]t
SFX G   t   joties  [āēīoū]t

SFX C Y 20
SFX C  āt  u       [^j][ā]t
SFX C  āt  i       [^j][ā]t
SFX C  āt  a       [^j][ā]t
SFX C  āt  ām      [^j][ā]t
SFX C  āt  ot      [^j][ā]t
SFX C  āt  iet     [^j][ā]t
SFX C  ēt  u       [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  i       [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  0       [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  am      [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  at      [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  iet     [ē]t
SFX C  ēt  ot      [ē]t
SFX C  īt  u       [ī]t
SFX C  īt  i       [ī]t
SFX C  īt  a       [ī]t
SFX C  īt  ām      [ī]t
SFX C  īt  āt      [ī]t
SFX C  īt  iet     [ī]t
SFX C  īt  ot      [ī]t

SFX c Y 25
SFX c  0   ies    [ā]t
SFX c  āt  os     [ā]t
SFX c  āt  ies    [ā]t
SFX c  t   mies   [ā]t
SFX c  āt  ieties [ā]t
SFX c  āt  oties  [ā]t
SFX c  t   šoties [ā]t
SFX c  0   ies    [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  os     [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  ies    [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  as     [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  amies  [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  aties  [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  ieties [ē]t
SFX c  ēt  oties  [ē]t
SFX c  t   šoties [ē]t
SFX c  0   ies    [ī]t
SFX c  īt  os     [ī]t
SFX c  īt  ies    [ī]t
SFX c  īt  ās     [ī]t
SFX c  īt  āmies  [ī]t
SFX c  īt  āties  [ī]t
SFX c  īt  ieties [ī]t
SFX c  īt  oties  [ī]t
SFX c  t   šoties [ī]t

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   t    dams    t
SFX M   t    dama    t
SFX M   t    dami    t
SFX M   t    damas   t

SFX N Y 4
SFX N   st   zdams   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdama   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdami   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdamas  [s]t

SFX [ Y 4
SFX [   t    damies    [^s]t
SFX [   t    damās     [^s]t
SFX [   st   zdamies [s]t
SFX [   st   zdamās  [s]t

SFX ] Y 3
SFX ]   t    šanos     [^sz]t
SFX ]   st   šanos     [s]t
SFX ]   zt   šanos     [z]t

SFX { Y 2
SFX { t  jušies    t
SFX { t  jusies    t

SFX p Y 1
SFX p t  jošies    t

SFX } Y 6
SFX } t  ušies    [^āēī]t
SFX } t  usies    [^āēī]t
SFX } t  ošies    [^āēī]t
SFX } āt  ošies    [ā]t
SFX } ēt  ošies    [ē]t
SFX } īt  ošies    [ī]t

SFX Z Y 23
SFX Z   t   stams     t
SFX Z   t   stama     t
SFX Z   t   stamam    t
SFX Z   t   stamu     t
SFX Z   t   stamā     t
SFX Z   t   stamas    t
SFX Z   t   stamai    t
SFX Z   t   stami     t
SFX Z   t   stamiem   t
SFX Z   t   stamus    t
SFX Z   t   stamos    t
SFX Z   t   stamām    t
SFX Z   t   stamās    t
SFX Z   t   stamais   t
SFX Z   t   stamajam  t
SFX Z   t   stamo     t
SFX Z   t   stamajā   t
SFX Z   t   stamajai  t
SFX Z   t   stamie    t
SFX Z   t   stamajiem t
SFX Z   t   stamajos  t
SFX Z   t   stamajām  t
SFX Z   t   stamajās  t

SFX )   Y 23
SFX )   t   jams     t
SFX )   t   jama     t
SFX )   t   jamam    t
SFX )   t   jamu     t
SFX )   t   jamā     t
SFX )   t   jamas    t
SFX )   t   jamai    t
SFX )   t   jami     t
SFX )   t   jamiem   t
SFX )   t   jamus    t
SFX )   t   jamos    t
SFX )   t   jamām    t
SFX )   t   jamās    t
SFX )   t   jamais   t
SFX )   t   jamajam  t
SFX )   t   jamo     t
SFX )   t   jamajā   t
SFX )   t   jamajai  t
SFX )   t   jamie    t
SFX )   t   jamajiem t
SFX )   t   jamajos  t
SFX )   t   jamajām  t
SFX )   t   jamajās  t
