NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
apcirst/I+NJ]B4d[7
apdalīt/Ib{+c*g(hBd[&M1CJ]
apdvest/3e+FI
apjādināt/b+ghBI1(d{cCJ}M[]
apkārnīt/g1+bc(MJdBh{IC[]
apkāsēt/)HJ+$IMbB1
aplakt/MTd+9BJ[7I4]
aplavēt/BbH$)+JI1M
apmaurot/+dIHg)BbG1${MJ[]p
apmirguļot/)+bHI$M1BJ
apmēļot/)Hg$b+I1BG{dJ[M]p
apnikt/4T+J]BI9dM[3
appūt/+9B7ZI4JM^
apskaidrot/)+1IBdb{$gHpG[JM]
apspridzināt/BdbIJ]+c(g[1h}{MC
apzīmogot/+bB)JIg$dM[1HG]p{
apžvadzināt/+gIbMchC{[(Bd1J}]
atciest/JN
atdāvināt/b+hMCIJ(B1
atkrist/3Id+B[N]J
atlikt/BI+J9dT47[M]
atmazgāt/gJM+1BI)]db$pGH{[
atmuitot/b$+JIBHM)1
atogļot/b$+H)JBI1M
atpampt/+^MJI7eZB4
atpiņķerēt/+,J[bHg$)IBdM.1G{p]
atrunāt/)$b+B[JMGgId1{p]H
atrāpot/I+J$b)B1HM
atspīdēt/+IBhcC(Jg}b[Md{]1
atsvepstēt/+bBd(ICc1ghJ]{[}M
attriekt/+%9IB5d[]6
attupt/+^eIMZRdB4TJ7[]
attēst/30+F
atņaudēt/h+b(IJBMC1
atšķīst/I+%bJEN7
bļitkot/+JIdb$)GBHg[M{p1]
dezinficēt/[+GBIHbgJ].,d$p){M1
drukāt/+BI1gb)$pJGH[dM{]
dzeltēt/M+)$bJIHB1
dzīrot/{+$1g)IdbJBGH[]Mp
gurt/+B4IJM^e7Z
gāgāt/gBI$+Gb{d)1[MpJH]
gūt/]MJ9+7RB4IZd[^
iebikstīt/cI(h+dbBJ{[gM]1C
ieblīkšķēt/cb+d[h}IgBC(J1]M{
iederēt/+[J(dBIch1gMb}{C]
iedimdināt/I+hb({Mc1BdgC[J]}
iekniest/eJIM3F
iekrekšķēt/d+(I{b[ch}BJ1gCM]
ieplūkāt/g)+GHM$BpbIdJ][1{
iesakņot/b$dB+JI{)]g1MGH[p
ieskaņot/p$+gbHB)IJ]Md{G1[
ieslānīt/+gbdJhc]I(B{C[1M
ieslēpot/$I+bH1B)JM
iesmērēt/,+.Bdbg$G)J{I]HM1p[
iespiest/J0N
ietirpst/+7
ietvīkt/+9Z^IJB74M
ievēst/I+F3JeM
iečivināt/+IBdcghJ(b[C{1M}]
industrializēt/)G+g$1IB[bdJMH{p]
inhalēt/H$)+MIbBJ1
izaicināt/+bIB(1dhgJc[MC]{}
izgrābstīt/+hI(]Jbgcd{BM1[C
izklauvēt/)+IGB[bHg{d1M$J]p
izmakšķerēt/$+b1I{BHgJ)[pMGd]
izmanevrēt/+b$JHBI)M1
izmest/B+NdI43[
izmīņāt/)g+dI1Bb{G[H$JpM]
izplānot/*+&)JIG[dg$b{1BpHM]
izskaust/0N
izsmirdēt/+[d(BI1hJbMc}g{]C
izspīdēt/+(dB1gIbchC[M}{]J
izstatīt/+{(cM[bJhdgBIC1]
izstenēt/ch+bJ]C(I{dBM}1g[
izsvīst/+7I%JbNE
iztecināt/+dIB(1bchg[}MJ{]C
izvārgt/^+BJZM9I4
izvēkšķēt/+hJ({Cc1BIdg}]Mb[
kaulēt/+)gH$Bd1bIp[GJ]M{
kriminalizēt/dg+[)$bJIG{MB1H]p
kuģot/+.M,)Gb$dBI[1g{pJH]
kāst/+eTIF3]
legalizēt/J)b+GI$pdMgHB1[{]
lādēt/bB$IHgJ)+h(Mpdc[{G}1]C
lēnināt/(+1BIdgcb{[Jh}C]M
metalizēt/)+Gb$J[dIgH]{BM1p
mācīt/gb&I*+Bdcr{M1J][C
mērdēt/+[bGBd)HgI{MJ]$p1
nobraukāt/+b$p)GId]J{MB1gH[
nodimdināt/cC{h+I(Bdb}J1g[M]
noelst/+ITeF3]
noglaust/J0N
noiezt/JM
nokausēt/J]b+g){$dIMBp1HG[
nokrekšķēt/h+I(MJb{dgB1[cC}]
nolidot/+IJb$)B1MH
nolīt/ZJ+^IBM75
nomierināt/+&I*g1b{(Jdh[cBMC]}
nonāvēt/$+G[)bHp{gJIBd1M]
nopost/+FIe3
norimt/+ZIdeT7RBJ]^4M[
norāpot/+JIG)$Hg{bB1dM[]p
nosautēt/+Bd$bG[J]I1g){HMp
nostāvēt/h+{}bBI1dg(cMJC][
notiesāt/IB+)$[MbgHGd1J{p]
nošmakstināt/+bhJ[d]&*(Ig{B1cCM}
nošķobīt/(bgJd+hBIMc[{1]C
nošķērst/JN
pabalot/)G$IJ+db{1gpBMH[]
padiskutēt/H$)bJ+I1BM
pagrūt/7+^IMZ49JB
pagudrot/+$IJ)MB1bH
pailgt/+I9J^BMZ4
paklidzināt/IcJ+bg(1BhdC{]}M[
paknakšķināt/I+BJbMh(C1
pakratīt/+c(Ig1Bbh]JCd{M[
palaidināt/(+bhgc}BdI{MCJ]1[
paskatīt/+bgIcB(h[J{dM]1C
paskolot/G)+IB1b[{dJg$HM]p
pasulot/+)bIJ$B1MH
patrūkt/BM+J^97I4
patupt/IdJ]+ZR^B[4Te7M
paurkšķēt/+gbIBdc(h1[MC{J}]
pavest/bN+EJ]I[
pavizēt/$G[)+gJIBd1{bpHM]
paķīlāt/H+p$)IG[d{bg1]JBM
piebaurot/I+dg1b{$H[)B]JpGM
pieelst/eI3+F
piekašņāt/+bgMBd1IJGH)]${p[
piekrāmēt/+bJG$dB)]*1gI{[&HMp
piepurkšķēt/bCI(h+JB1M
pieskaust/NJ
pieskābt/+eB7Z^JIM4
pieslīgt/I9+Z^BM4J
piespļaudīt/+c(BI[hMb1Jg]d{C
piesvētīt/+BI$bJHM1
pievēžot/I+bH)MJB1
piņķerēt/[+GJb$)MIBgpd{H1]
plisēt/+b,I$B.J)1HM
profilēt/)+Mdb$JBpI{HGg[1]
pārkabināt/(dbgh1IB+Jc[}]M{C
pārkausēt/[+d)GbHg$JBIM{1p]
pārkuplināt/cCh+J](bMBdgI{1[}
pārlidot/+IJd)Bb{g$H]Gp[1M
pārlīst/J0N
pārmelst/e+FI3
pārskriet/+[dBJ]I7M84
pārskurbt/^+ZeIM7BJ4
pārslīgt/9+I^BZMJ4
pārsterilizēt/IB$+1JH)bM
pārtestēt/+)I$pbgGJM[{]dHB1
rādīt/+BdgbIh(c{J]1MC[
sablīkšķēt/BCh(I+bMJ1
sabružāt/+b$)dBIJ{G1gM[H]p
sacirst/+BIdJN4[7]
sadestilēt/+Bd)bJ$1IgH{Gp][M
sadrebināt/+({BdhJIcbgM[]C}1
sadāvāt/]J)+$bIHGg1B{[dMp
sakarsēt/+MI,1gdJ.B$p{b)G[H]
salietot/]J+bGg)IH$pB1Md{[
salkt/+^9JMI7ZB4
salīkt/+9Z^BJMI47
samainīt/+Ih(BM[gbcdJ]1{C
samazināt/+Cc&*JhI1g(bB{Md[]}
sameklēt/+)IbG{d[Bg$JM1pH]
saplēst/+Ie3F]T
sasēst/%IJb]+E7N[
satrūkt/M+^IR9JdZ[BT7]4
saudzēt/+$,Bb[H)G<>.Idg1J]{Mp
savilkt/+MdBJ[IT]497
savirknēt/$+[gIGdJMb){HBp1]
savārīt/+hcBdI(J{gbM[1]C
sažulgst/+7
smīdināt/h+dCIc(gb[JB1M}{]
statīt/h+JBb{gcM(1Id[]C
stādīt/gb+(hcIdJMB{][1C
tapināt/Bd+gI[hJcb(]M1{C}
uzknubināt/[bhg}+B(IdcCJ{1M]
uzlidināt/+(IJBhbCc1g[dM}{]
uzmeistarot/+)M[dIBb${G.J,1gp]H
uzrakt/d+9I[7BTJ4]M
uzsaiņot/+Ib)$B1JMH
uzspārdīt/+[hbIMcgJ(d]BC{1
uzsukāt/+I)dbgH$G1B{]J[pM
uztēst/3+eIF
uzvibrēt/Bb$)H1I+MJ
vircot/Jb)]$+IM1g[BdG{Hp
ēdināt/+chIbdg]J(1B{C}M[
ēst/b[J+I8E]N
īdēt/hb(B+JI1CM
ņerkstēt/d+hgbBI(JMCc1{[}]
žūt/MJ+79BIZ4^
